Mississippi, session 2026, HB1632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Sections 1 through 17 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wastewater Treatment System Infrastructure Sustainability Act". SECTION 2.  For purposes of Sections 1 through 17 of this act, the following words and phrases have the meanings as provided in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Community Public Wastewater System" means a public wastewater collection and/or treatment system serving at least fifteen (15) individual service connections used by year-round consumers or regularly servicing at least twenty-five (25) individual consumers year-round. (b)  "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality. (c)  "Person" means an individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, municipality or federal agency. SECTION 3. There is hereby established a Community Public Wastewater System accountability process to: (a)  Support Community Public Wastewater System infrastructure sustainability for the citizens of Mississippi. (b)  Promote the protection of the citizens of Mississippi from environmental hazards and deficient service by assuring that wastewater collected and treated by Community Public Wastewater System remains consistently managed at levels essential for public health, safety, welfare, and long-term sustainability. (c)  Establish a transparent accountability process that creates clear standards and expectations for Community Public Wastewater System so that assessment of their quality, performance, and sustainability will be understood. SECTION 4. The department shall create and administer a statewide framework of accountability for Community Public Wastewater Systems.  The framework shall include a letter grade schedule based on, at minimum, the following criteria: (a)  Compliance with state and federal permits. (b)  Compliance with water quality standards under Section 49-17-1, et seq. (c)  Wastewater system financial sustainability. (d)  Operation and maintenance performance history. (e)  Infrastructure condition and compliance. (f)  Customer satisfaction. SECTION 5. (1)  The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to establish and implement the Community Public Wastewater System letter grade schedule provided for in Sections 1 through 17 of this act. Such rules and regulations shall provide clear and appropriate point values for each standard set forth in this section and other assessed criteria as determined by the department that is used to calculate the Community Public Wastewater System's letter grade. Point values shall be based on objective criteria so that each Community Public Wastewater System is assessed equally and fairly.  Community Public Wastewater Systems shall be assigned a letter grade of "A", "B", "C", "D", or "F".  A consolidated score and letter grade shall be calculated on a weighted-average basis for any person owning more than one (1) Community Public Wastewater System in the state. (2)  For each Community Public Wastewater System, the department shall publish on its website an annual report summarizing the department's assessment, scores and letter grade.      Every Community Public Wastewater System shall provide notification to its customers of the department's published score and letter grade within thirty (30) days following publication by the department in a manner to be established by regulation by the department. SECTION 6. The department shall publish the first letter grades issued pursuant to Sections 1 through 17 of this act no later than January 1, 2028. SECTION 7.  Section 49-2-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-2-9.  (1)  Effective July 1, 1979, the commission shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To formulate the policy of the department regarding natural resources within the jurisdiction of the department; (b)  To adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, to make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from, and to enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the commission under any and all statutes within the commission's jurisdiction, and as the commission may deem necessary to prevent, control and abate existing or potential pollution; (c)  To apply for, receive and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, devises, bequests or funds from any other source; (d)  To commission or conduct studies designed to determine alternative methods of managing or using the natural resources of this state, in a manner to ensure efficiency and maximum productivity; (e)  To enter into, and to authorize the executive director to execute with the approval of the commission, contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the provisions of this chapter; but this authority under this chapter and under any and all statutes within the commission's jurisdiction, except those statutes relating to the Bureau of Recreation and Parks, shall not include contracts, grants or cooperative agreements which do not develop data or information usable by the commission, or which provide goods, services or facilities to the commission or any of its bureaus, and shall exclude any monies for special interest groups for purposes of lobbying or otherwise promoting their special interests; and (f)  To discharge such other duties, responsibilities and powers as are necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, Office of Geology and Energy Resources shall be responsible for program management, procurement, development and maintenance of the Mississippi Digital Earth Model, which should include the following seven (7) core data layers of a digital land base computer model of the State of Mississippi: (a)  Geodetic control; (b)  Elevation and bathymetry; (c)  Orthoimagery; (d)  Hydrography; (e)  Transportation; (f)  Government boundaries; and (g)  Cadastral.  With respect to the cadastral layer, the authority and responsibility of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, Office of Geology and Energy Resources shall be limited to compiling information submitted by counties. For all seven (7) framework layers, the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, Office of Geology and Energy Resources shall be the integrator of data from all sources and the guarantor of data completeness and consistency and shall administer the council's policies and standards for the procurement of remote sensing and geographic information system data by state and local governmental entities. SECTION 8.  Section 49-2-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-2-13.  The executive director shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To administer the policies of the commission within the authority granted by the commission; (b)  To supervise and direct all administrative and technical activities of the department; (c)  To organize the administrative units of the department in accordance with the plan adopted by the commission and, with commission approval, alter such organizational plan and reassign responsibilities as he may deem necessary to carry out the policies of the commission; (d)  To coordinate the activities of the various offices of the department; (e)  To employ, subject to the approval of the commission, qualified professional personnel in the subject matter or fields of each office, and such other technical and clerical staff as may be required for the operation of the department; (f)  To recommend to the commission such studies and investigations as he may deem appropriate, and to carry out the approved recommendations in conjunction with the various offices; (g)  To merge and coordinate functions and duties where possible to eliminate the possibility of two (2) separate organizational entities performing the same or similar functions, including, but not limited to, functions of audit, inspection, collection, personnel, motor vehicles, accounting, data processing, payroll and any other such administrative, procedural or enforcement function; (h)  To coordinate all studies in the State of Mississippi concerned with the supply, development, use and conservation of natural resources within the jurisdiction of the department; (i)  To prepare and deliver to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1 of each year, and at such other times as may be required by the Legislature or Governor, a full report of the work of the department and the offices thereof, including a detailed statement of expenditures of the department and any recommendations the commission may have; (j)  To issue, modify or revoke any and all orders under authority granted by the commission which include, but are not limited to those which (i) prohibit, control or abate discharges of contaminants and wastes into the air and waters of the state; (ii) require the construction of new disposal systems or air-cleaning devices or any parts thereof, or the modification, extension or alteration of existing disposal systems or air-cleaning devices or any parts thereof, or the adoption of other remedial measures to prevent, control or abate air and water pollution or to cause the proper management of solid wastes; (iii) impose penalties pursuant to Section 17-17-29 and Section 49-17-43 which have been agreed upon with alleged violators; and (iv) require compliance with the conditions of any permit issued by the Permit Board created in Section 49-17-28 and all regulations of the commission; (k)  With the approval of the commission, to enter into contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the provisions of this chapter, provided the agreements do not have a financial cost in excess of the amounts appropriated for such purposes by the Legislature; and (l)  With the approval of the commission, to enter into a contract(s) with any person or any public or private corporate entity to assist with the review, evaluation and processing of permit application(s) and/or certification application(s).  Any person or entity requesting additional assistance for review, evaluation, and processing of an application for permit(s) or certification(s) must agree to pay all additional costs associated with such review, evaluation, and processing.  The executive director shall submit an annual report on the following to the Chairs of the House and Senate Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees: (i)  The backlog of permit applications and/or certification applications that exist on July 1, 2024; (ii)  The backlog of permit applications and/or certification applications that exist when the report is submitted; (iii)  The average price of permits and/or certifications that are being expedited; (iv)  The types of permits and/or certifications that are being expedited; (v)  What persons or public or private corporate entities are being used to assist with the review, evaluation and processing of permit applications and/or certification applications; (vi)  How much the persons or public or private corporate entities have been paid through the program; and (vii)  How many people leave the department for employment with the persons or public or private corporate entities that are being used to assist with the review, evaluation and processing of permit applications and/or certification applications. This paragraph (1) shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028. SECTION 9.  Section 77-3-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-3-2.  (1)  The Legislature finds and determines that the rates, services and operations of public utilities as defined in this title are affected with the public interest and that the availability of an adequate and reliable service by such public utilities to the people, economy and government of the State of Mississippi is a matter of public policy.  The Legislature hereby declares to be the policy of the State of Mississippi: (a)  To provide fair regulation of public utilities in the interest of the public; (b)  To promote the inherent advantage of regulated public utilities; (c)  To promote adequate, reliable and economical service to all citizens and residents of the state; (d)  To provide just and reasonable rates and charges for public utility services without unjust discrimination, undue preferences or advantages, or unfair or destructive competitive practices and consistent with long-term management and conservation of energy resources by avoiding wasteful, uneconomic and inefficient uses of energy; (e)  To encourage and promote harmony between public utilities, their users and the environment; (f)  To foster the continued service of public utilities on a well-planned and coordinated basis that is consistent with the level of service needed for the protection of public health and safety and for the promotion of the general welfare; (g)  To cooperate with other states and the federal government in promoting and coordinating interstate and intrastate public utility service and reliability; (h)  To encourage the continued study and research for new and innovative rate-making procedures which will protect the state, the public, the ratepayers and the utilities, and where possible reduce the costs of the rate-making process; and (i)  With respect to rate-regulated public utilities, to foster, encourage, enable and facilitate economic development in the State of Mississippi, to support and augment economic development activities, to expand deployment of existing and emerging technologies, including fiber-optic infrastructure which will foster a more reliable and resilient utility delivery system and provide customer access to enhanced services, to authorize and empower the Public Service Commission in carrying out its statutory responsibilities, and to take every opportunity to advance the economic development of the state. (2)  To these ends, therefore, authority shall be vested in the Mississippi Public Service Commission to regulate public utilities in accordance with the provisions of this title. (3)  (a)  The commission shall, in addition to its other powers and duties, be authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to consider and adopt a formula type rate of return evaluation rate which may include provision for the commission to: (i)  Periodically review and adjust, if required, the utility's level of revenues based upon the actual books and records of the utility which are periodically the subject of independent audits and regulatory audits; (ii)  Review the utility's performance in certain areas or categories which may be used by the commission in the manner selected by it which may include rate incentives or penalties so long as such are found to be fair and reasonable and result in a level of revenue which is fair and reasonable; and (iii)  Use such other provisions which may be permitted by this chapter. (b)  When a formula type rate of return evaluation rate with periodic revenue adjustments is adopted by the commission, each periodic revenue adjustment will be separately considered for the purpose of determining whether a hearing is required pursuant to Section 77-3-39(1), and no such hearing shall be required if the amount of any separate periodic adjustment to the level of revenues of the utility is not a "major change" as defined in Section 77-3-37(8). (c)  In administering any such formula type rate of return evaluation rate, the following procedures shall be observed by the commission: (i)  Each periodic evaluation shall be supported with a sworn filing by the utility incorporating the data specified in the formula rate adopted by the commission, and such data shall be verified by the commission; and (ii)  A hearing shall be required, as provided by law, to determine compliance with the formula rate plan and the accuracy of the data prior to any change in the level of revenues if the cumulative change in any calendar year exceeds the greater of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) or four percent (4%) of the annual revenues of the utility. (d)  The requirements of paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection and other applicable provisions of Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, which are observed by the commission in administering such rate, are hereby declared to be procedural but are not required to be included in the rate itself. (4)  It is the intention of the Legislature to validate, retroactively to its initial adoption by the commission, any formula type rate, including any revenue adjustments effected pursuant thereto, which has heretofore been adopted by the commission.  For the purposes of the retroactive validation and the administration of any formula type rate heretofore adopted by the commission, should the provisions of Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, conflict with any provisions of such formula type rate, Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be interpreted to prevail and the formula type rate shall hereafter be administered or revised to conform to Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972; provided, however, such conflict, if any, shall not be held to invalidate the retroactive effect of this section upon such rate. SECTION 10.  Section 77-3-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-3-5.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and subject only to the limitations imposed in this chapter and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the Public Service Commission shall have exclusive original jurisdiction over the intrastate business and property of public utilities and, for purposes of clarification of the existing scope of said exclusive original jurisdiction, such exclusive original jurisdiction extends, but is not limited to:  the establishment of retail rates; challenges, including customer complaints, to the amount of a retail rate or customer bill or whether such rate is just and reasonable; and challenges to the validity or accuracy of rates charged by a public utility, or to the accuracy or reliability of information submitted to the Public Service Commission by a public utility or other person in support of or in opposition to a proposed or approved rate, regardless of the legal theory upon which any such challenge is made.  However, the commission shall not have jurisdiction over the production and gathering of natural gas or the sale of natural gas in or within the vicinity of the field where produced, or over the facilities and equipment utilized in any such operations, including, but not limited to, such facilities as separators, scrubbers and gasoline plants of all types.  Further, the commission shall not have jurisdiction over the governance, management or other internal affairs of entities as described by paragraphs (b) and (c) below.  Moreover, the commission shall not have jurisdiction to regulate the rates for the sales and/or distribution: (a)  Of gas, water, electricity or sewage disposal services by municipalities to such persons as said municipalities are authorized by law to serve; (b)  Of gas or electricity by cooperative gas or electric power associations to the members thereof as consumers, except as provided by Section 77-3-17, where service is rendered in a municipality; (c)  Of water or sewage disposal service by nonprofit corporations or associations where the governing body of such corporation or association is elected by the consumers thereof or appointed by the county board of supervisors; or (d)  Of water by districts organized under the provisions of Chapter 45, Laws of 1966-1967, Extraordinary Session. SECTION 11.  Section 19-5-175, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-175.  Districts created under the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall have the powers enumerated in the resolution of the board of supervisors creating such districts but shall be limited to the conducting and operating of a water supply system, a sewer system, a garbage and waste collection and disposal system, a fire protection system, a combined water and fire protection system, a combined water and sewer system, a combined water and garbage and waste collection and disposal system, or a combined water, sewer, garbage and waste collection and disposal and fire protection system; and to carry out such purpose or purposes, such districts shall have the power and authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, better, extend, consolidate, maintain and operate such system or systems, and to contract with any municipality, person, firm or corporation for such services and for a supply and distribution of water, for collection, transportation, treatment and/or disposal of sewage and for services required incident to the operation and maintenance of such systems.  As long as any such district continues to furnish any of the services which it was authorized to furnish in and by the resolution by which it was created, it shall be the sole public corporation empowered to furnish such services within such district.  However, if the board of commissioners of such district and the board of supervisors unanimously agree, the county may contract directly with any fire protection services provider, in which case the board of supervisors may distribute directly to the fire protection services provider any or all of the funds that otherwise would be distributed to the fire protection district. Any district created pursuant to the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall be vested with all the powers necessary and requisite for the accomplishment of the purpose for which such district is created.  No enumeration of powers herein shall be construed to impair or limit any general grant of power herein contained nor to limit any such grant to a power or powers of the same class or classes as those enumerated.  Such districts are empowered to do all acts necessary, proper or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted under such sections. SECTION 12.  Section 21-27-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-7.  (1)  (a)  The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to erect, purchase, maintain and operate waterworks, and to regulate the same, and to prescribe the rates at which water shall be supplied to the users.  The rates at which water, wastewater, and sewer services shall be supplied shall be just and reasonable based on the actual cost to operate and maintain the systems, and rates may not be unreasonably preferential, prejudicial or discriminatory but shall be sufficient, equitable and consistent in application to each class of users.  While a municipality may set different rates for different classifications of users, a municipality shall not discriminate in setting rates among members of the same classification.  The municipal governing authorities shall make a finding on the minutes of the governing body establishing the rate based on the actual cost to operate and maintain the system.  A municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received which is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (b)  The governing authorities of a municipality shall establish and maintain rates and charges in equitable proportion to the use of the services and benefits rendered by the waterworks systems and water treatment facilities serving the municipal area. From time to time the governing authorities shall adjust such rates, to the end that the revenues therefrom will be sufficient at all times to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining such works, facilities and systems and all of the municipality's obligations under any contract or bond resolution with respect thereto.  The calculation of a user's bill shall be limited to the actual amount of volumetric usage, plus those fees reasonable and necessary for the cost of capital expenses, system operation and maintenance, and debt service. (c)  If a user's meter is tampered with, unreadable, or otherwise out-of-order, a municipality may render an estimated bill to that user for a period not to exceed six (6) months.  In such circumstance, an estimated bill shall be based upon the prior average measured usage of the user or a similar user of the same classification. (i)  Only in the event a municipality is unable to meet the requirement of billing based solely on volumetric usage, such municipality may bill based on a flat fee rate where such municipality has established flat fee billing as its usual and customary billing practice prior to July 1, 2023, and where such municipality is actively billing based upon a flat fee rate as of July 1,2023.  In such circumstances, flat fee billing may be utilized until such time as the municipality implements upgrades to its system to provide for volumetric billing.  In such circumstance, the municipality may set different flat fee rates for different classifications of users, but the municipality shall not discriminate in setting flat fee rates among members of the same classification, and the municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (ii)  The governing authorities of the municipality shall make a finding annually on the minutes of the governing body establishing the rate based upon the actual cost to operate and maintain the system as determined under Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, and the municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality, or based on the assessed value of the property, to provide such services. (d)  Notice of any change in the rate or rate structure at which services are supplied shall be posted on all bills sent to users at least one (1) month prior to the effective date of the rate change.  Notice shall also be posted to the municipality's online web page or bill payment platform, if the municipality has an online web page or bill payment platform. (e)  Nothing in this statute shall be construed as prohibiting a user or governing authority of any municipality from applying for and receiving any federally or privately subsidized payment assistance, grant or other funds. (f)  The governing authority of a municipality may provide for the calculation of a user's bill by a method other than volumetric usage only in exchange for consideration as part of, or in connection with, an incentive contract or other form of benefit or assistance related to the user's location, expansion, or maintenance of its commercial or industrial operation within the municipality, so long as such rate is equitable, fair, and nondiscriminatory, and the municipality shall not charge such user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (2)  The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to acquire by purchase, donation or condemnation, in the name of the municipality, suitable grounds, within or without the corporate limits, upon which to erect waterworks, and also the right-of-way to and from such works and the right-of-way for laying water pipes within the corporate limits, and from such waterworks to the municipality, and to extend such right-of-way from time to time.  The governing authorities shall have the power to contract with any person for the maintenance and operation of waterworks.  The authorities shall have the power to contract with any person for the erection and maintenance of waterworks for a term not exceeding twenty-five (25) years, fixing water rates in the contract subject to municipal regulations.  A contract for the erection or purchase of waterworks shall not, however, be entered into until submitted to a vote of the qualified electors and approved by a majority of those voting.  A contract for maintenance under which the person who will perform such maintenance is wholly or partially responsible for fixing water rates shall not be entered into until submitted to a vote of the qualified electors and approved by a majority of those voting.  It shall be unlawful for any municipally owned waterworks to supply water free of charge, or in any amount less than the fixed charges, to any person, firm or corporation, except as is expressly authorized by law. SECTION 13.  Section 21-27-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-13.  The governing authorities of any municipality which now owns and operates, or hereafter shall own and operate, any system or systems shall have the power and authority to create a commission to control, manage and operate such systems, or any one or more of them, which said commission shall consist of not less than three (3) nor more than five (5) commissioners, to be elected by the governing authorities of such municipality.  In any municipality operating under the council-manager plan of government, such commissioners shall be selected by, and shall be under the control of, the mayor and councilmen of the municipality, and not the city or town manager.  Such commissioners shall have the power, authority and duty to manage and control said system or systems and the supply of the facilities and services thereof, both within and without the limits of the municipality.  Such commissioners shall be qualified electors of the municipality and shall not hold any other municipal office for honor or profit.  Such commissioners shall receive such compensation as may be specified and provided by the governing authorities of said municipality; provided, however, that any commission formed for the purpose of establishing a motor vehicle transportation system for the transportation of passengers within the boundaries of the governmental unit or units concerned, and within three (3) miles thereof, may pay its commissioners from the operating budget of such commission per diem compensation in the amount provided by Section 25-3-69 for each day or fraction of a day engaged in attendance of meetings of the commission or engaged in other official duties of the commission, not to exceed forty-five (45) days in any one (1) year.  The governing authorities of the municipality are hereby authorized and empowered to require such commissioners to furnish bonds for the faithful performance of their duties, in the amount as may be deemed proper, and to pay the premiums thereon from the municipal treasury or the available funds of the said system or systems.  Where there are three (3) members of such commission, the term of office shall be for a period of three (3) years, and where there are four (4) members the term of office shall be for a period of four (4) years, and where there are five (5) members the term of office shall be for a period of five (5) years.  However, in making the first appointment of commissioners, one (1) shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, one (1) for a term of three (3) years and, where necessary, one (1) for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) for a term of five (5) years, so that thereafter the term of office of one (1) commissioner shall expire each year.  Where the governing authorities of the municipality do not elect to create a commission as herein provided, then any system or systems owned and operated by the municipality shall be controlled and managed by the governing authorities of the municipality, who shall have all the power and authority conferred upon such commission. SECTION 14.  Section 21-27-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-203.  For purposes of Sections 21-27-201 through 21-27-221, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context shall otherwise require: (a)  "Association" means the Mississippi Water and Pollution Control Operator's Association, Inc. (b)  "Board" means the Mississippi State Board of Health. (c)  "Commission" means the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality. (d)  "Community water system" means a public water system serving piped water for human consumption to fifteen (15) or more individual service connections used by year-round consumers or regularly serving twenty-five (25) or more individual consumers year-round, including, but not limited to, any collection, pretreatment, treatment, storage and/or distribution facilities or equipment used primarily as part of, or in connection with, that system, regardless of whether or not the components are under the ownership or control of the operator of the system. (e)  "Commercial Class I rubbish site" means a permitted rubbish site which accepts for disposal Class I rubbish, as defined by the commission, for compensation or from more than one (1) generator. (f)  "Nontransient, noncommunity water system" means a public water system that is not a community water system and that regularly serves at least twenty-five (25) of the same persons over six (6) months per year. (g)  "Operator" means the person who directly supervises and is personally responsible for the daily operation and maintenance of a wastewater facility, community water system, nontransient, noncommunity water system or commercial nonhazardous solid waste management landfill. (h)  "Person" means the state or any agency or institution of the state, any municipality, political subdivision, public or private corporation, individual, partnership, association or other entity, including any officer or governing or managing body of any municipality, political subdivision, or public or private corporation, or the United States or any officer or employee of the United States. (i)  "Pollution" means contamination or other alteration of the physical, chemical or biological properties of any waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity or odor of the waters, or the discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive or other substance or heat into any waters of the state. (j)  "Wastewater facilities" means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, force mains, treatment plants, lagoons or any other structure, device, appurtenance or facility, whether operated individually or in any combination, used for collecting, treating and/or disposing of municipal or domestic wastewater, by either surface or underground methods, which is required to have a permit under Section 49-17-29. (k)  "Waters of the state" means all waters within the jurisdiction of this state, including all streams, lakes, ponds, impounding reservoirs, marshes, watercourses, waterways, wells, springs, irrigation systems, drainage systems and all other bodies or accumulations of water, surface and underground, natural or artificial, situated wholly or partly within or bordering upon the state, and such coastal waters as are within the jurisdiction of the state, except lakes, ponds or other surface waters which are wholly landlocked and privately owned. SECTION 15.  Section 49-17-743, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-743.  From and after April 18, 2006, each and every county authority shall have, in addition to any other powers granted under any other provision of law, including, but not limited to, the following: (a)  To acquire, construct, improve, enlarge, extend, repair, operate and maintain one or more of its systems used for the collection, transportation, treatment and disposal of water, wastewater and storm water; (b)  To make contracts with any person in furtherance thereof; and to make contracts with any person, under the terms of which the county authority will collect, transport, treat or dispose of water, wastewater and storm water for such person; (c)  To make contracts with any person to design and construct any water, wastewater and storm water systems or facilities, and thereafter to purchase, lease or sell, by installments over such terms as may be deemed desirable, reasonable and necessary, or otherwise, any such system or systems; (d)  To enter into operating agreements with any person, for such terms and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, for the operation of any water, wastewater and storm water systems; and the county authority may lease to or from any person, for such term and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, any water, wastewater and storm water collection, transportation, treatment or its other facilities or systems.  Any such contract may contain provisions requiring any public agency or other person to regulate the quality and strength of materials to be handled by the respective system or systems and also may provide that the county authority shall have the right to use any streets, alleys and public ways and places within the jurisdiction of a public agency or other person during the term of the contract; (e)  To enter into contracts with any person or any public agency, including, but not limited to, contracts authorized by this act, in furtherance of any of the purposes authorized under this act upon such consideration as the board of directors and such person may agree.  Any such contract may extend over any period of time, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary; may be upon such terms and for such consideration, nominal or otherwise, as the parties thereto shall agree; and may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein, refunding bonds issued in lieu of such bonds, and all other obligations specified therein are paid or terminated.  Any such contract shall be binding upon the parties thereto according to its terms; (f)  To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure; (g)  To sue and be sued, in its own name, and to enjoy all of the protections, immunities and benefits provided by the Mississippi Tort Claims Act, as it may be amended or supplemented from time to time; (h)  To maintain office space at such place or places within the county authority boundaries as it may determine; (i)  To invest money of the county authority, including proceeds from the sale of any bonds subject to any agreements with bondholders, on such terms and in such manner as the county authority deems proper; (j)  To require the necessary relocation or rerouting of roads and highways, railroad, telephone and telegraph lines, and properties, electric power lines, gas pipelines and related facilities, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided fair compensation is first paid to the owners or an agreement with such owners regarding the payment of the cost of such relocation, and to acquire easements or rights-of-way for such relocation or rerouting and to convey the same to the owners of the property being relocated or rerouted in connection with the purposes of this act; (k)  To acquire, construct, improve or modify, to operate or cause to be operated and maintained, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others, any water, wastewater or storm water system within the county authority's service area.  The county authority may pay all or part of the cost of any system from any contribution by persons, firms, public agencies or corporations.  The county authority may receive, accept and use all funds, public or private, and pay all costs of the development, implementation and maintenance as may be determined as necessary for any project; (l)  To acquire, in its own name, by purchase on any terms and conditions and in any manner as it may deem proper, including by eminent domain, property for public use, or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real property or easements therein, franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes; (m)  To acquire insurance for the county authority's systems, facilities, buildings, treatment plants and all property, real or personal, to insure against all risks as any insurance may, from time to time, be available; (n)  To use any property and rent or lease any property to or from others, including public agencies, or make contracts for the use of the property.  The county authority may sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, mortgage or grant a security interest for any property.  The powers to acquire, use and dispose of property as set forth in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use and dispose of any interest in that property, whether divided or undivided. Title to any property of the county authority shall be held by the county authority exclusively for the benefit of the public; (o)  To apply, contract for, accept, receive and administer gifts, grants, appropriations and donations of money, materials and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, district or instrumentality of any of the foregoing, upon any terms and conditions as the United States, the state, a unit of local government, or any agency, department, district or instrumentality shall impose.  The county authority may administer trusts.  The county authority may sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate and pledge any and all of its property and assets; (p)  To make and enforce, and from time to time amend and repeal, bylaws, rules, ordinances and regulations for the management of its business and affairs and for the construction, use, maintenance and operation of any of the systems under its management and control; (q)  To employ and terminate staff and other personnel, including attorneys, engineers and consultants as may be necessary to the functioning of the county authority. The board of directors, in its discretion, may employ an executive director having the authority to employ and fire employees and other duties as determined by the board; (r)  To establish and maintain rates, fees and any other charges for services and the use of systems and facilities within the control of the county authority, and from time to time, to adjust such rates, fees and any other charges to the end that the revenues therefrom will be sufficient at all times to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining of the facilities and treatment systems and all of the persons' obligations under any contract or bonds resolution with respect thereto or any obligation of any person under any agreement, contract, indenture or bonds resolution with respect thereto.  Such rates, fees, assessments and any other charges shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Public Service Commission; (s)  To adopt rules and regulations necessary to accomplish the purposes of the county authority and to assure the payment of each participating person or public agency of its proportionate share of the costs for use of any of the systems and facilities of the county authority and for the county authority's proportionate share of the costs of the utility board; (t)  To enter on public or private lands, waters or premises for the purpose of making surveys, borings or soundings, or conducting tests, examinations or inspections for the purposes of the authority, subject to responsibility for any damage done to property entered; (u)  To accept industrial wastewater from within the boundaries of the county authority for treatment and to require the pretreatment of same when, in the opinion of the county authority, such pretreatment is necessary; (v)  To control and operate local retail water, wastewater and storm water services, and may provide or be responsible for direct servicing of those services to residences, businesses and individuals; however, the county authority shall not provide the same services in an area provided by a public utility or person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Public Service Commission for the provision of such services in the certificated area.  Any rates, fees, assessments or other charges shall not be under the control or regulation of the Mississippi Public Service Commission; (w)  To assume control and administer, within the county authority's jurisdiction, any water, wastewater or storm water system or systems by agreement or contract with any person if the person providing such services requests to be relieved of that responsibility.  However, the person may maintain control over connections in their service areas and may charge rates, fees and any other charges in addition to the rates, fees and any charges of the county authority; (x)  The county authority shall have the power of eminent domain for the particular purpose of the acquisition of property designated by plan to sufficiently accommodate the location of water, wastewater or storm water systems and such requirements related directly thereto pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 27, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The county authority may acquire by eminent domain property necessary for any system and the exercise of the powers, rights and duties conferred upon the county authority by this act.  No person owning the drilling rights or the right to share in production shall be prevented from exploring, developing or producing oil or gas with necessary rights-of-way for ingress and egress, pipelines and other means of transporting such interests on any lands or interest of the county authority held or used for the purposes of this act, but any such activities shall be subject to reasonable regulations by the board of directors that will adequately protect the systems or projects of the county authority; (y)  To use any legally available funds to acquire, rebuild, operate and maintain any existing water, wastewater or storm water systems owned or operated by any person; (z)  To refuse to receive water, wastewater or storm water from any public agency or person; and (aa)  So long as any indebtedness on the systems of the county authority remains outstanding, to require by contract with a member public agency, or other person, that all water, wastewater and storm water within the boundaries of the respective county authority be disposed of through the appropriate treatment system to the extent that the same may be available, but no public agency shall be precluded from constructing, operating and maintaining its own such system after the current indebtedness owing on the system as of April 18, 2006, is paid in full. SECTION 16.  Section 49-17-745, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-17-745.  (1)  The county authority shall have the power, duty and responsibility to exercise general supervision over the design, construction, operation and maintenance of water, wastewater and storm water systems. (2)  The county authority shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the design, construction or installation, operation and maintenance of water, wastewater and storm water systems. (3)  The county authority shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the use of decentralized treatment systems, individual on-site wastewater treatment systems and centralized wastewater treatment systems. (4)  The county authority shall adopt rules establishing performance standards for water, wastewater and storm water systems and the operation and maintenance of the same.  Such rules and regulations shall include the implementation of a standard application form for the installation, operation and maintenance of such systems; application review; approval or denial procedures for any proposed system; inspection, monitoring and reporting guidelines; and enforcement procedures. (5)  (a)  Before a building or development which requires the installation of a water, wastewater or storm water system is constructed, the system must be submitted to the county authority for certification that the system complies with the county authority requirements for such system. (b)  Before approving or renewing a water, wastewater or storm water related permit for a system within a county authority, the state agency must require certification that the system complies with the requirements of the county authority. (6)  Any system of any municipality, public agency or other persons which contracts with a county authority, shall be subject to the terms of that contract and the terms of this act. (7)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 51-39-1 et seq., the county authority shall have the full power to adopt rules and regulations and to construct, maintain and operate facilities for the control of storm water quality and quantity.  In addition, the provisions of Section 51-33-1 et seq. relating to drainage districts and flood control districts do not apply to the county authority. (8)  The county authority may control and operate the local retail water, wastewater or storm water services and may provide or be responsible for direct servicing of those services to residences, businesses and individuals; however, the county authority shall not provide the same service in an area provided by a public utility or person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Public Service Commission for the provision of such services in the certificated area. SECTION 17.  Section 41-67-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-67-3.  (1)  The board and/or the department shall have the following duties and responsibilities: (a)  To exercise general supervision over the design, installation, operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems, decentralized wastewater treatment systems and cluster systems; (b)  To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate rules and regulations, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, to make exceptions to, to grant exemptions from and to enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the duties of the board under this chapter to protect the public health.  The board may grant variances from rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, including requirements for buffer zones, or from setbacks required under Section 41-67-7 where the granting of a variance shall not subject the public to unreasonable health risks or jeopardize environmental resources; (c)  To provide or deny certification for persons engaging in the business for hire of the installation, operation or maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems and persons engaging in the removal and disposal of the sludge and liquid waste from those systems; (d)  To suspend or revoke certifications issued to persons engaging in the business for hire of the installation, operation or maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems or persons engaging in the removal and disposal of the sludge and liquid waste from those systems, when it is determined the person has violated this chapter or applicable rules and regulations; (e)  To require the submission of information deemed necessary by the department to determine the suitability of individual lots for individual on-site wastewater disposal systems for the purpose of commercial or residential development; and (f)  To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate rules and regulations, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, as necessary to determine the suitability of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in subdivisions. (2)  To assure the effective and efficient administration of this chapter, the board shall adopt rules governing the design, construction or installation, operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems, including rules concerning the: (a)  Review and approval of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems in accordance with Section 41-67-6; (b)  Certification of installers; (c)  Certification of pumpers; (d)  Certification of manufacturers; (e)  Certification of professional evaluators; and (f)  Creation of regulations that authorize the original and any subsequent homeowner to be trained by certified installers as defined in Section 41-67-25(2) or other factory representatives in order to educate the homeowner with the necessary knowledge to provide maintenance to the homeowner's system; no fees shall be charged to the homeowner for such training, thus allowing the homeowner to meet the requirements of Section 41-67-7(5). (3)  In addition, the board shall adopt rules establishing performance standards for individual on-site wastewater disposal systems for single family residential generators and rules concerning the operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems designed to meet those standards.  The performance standards shall be consistent with the federal Clean Water Act, maintaining the wastes on the property of the generator and protection of the public health.  Rules for the operation and maintenance of individual on-site wastewater disposal systems designed to meet performance standards shall include rules concerning the following: (a)  A standard application form and requirements for supporting documentation; (b)  Application review; (c)  Approval or denial of authorization for proposed systems; (d)  Requirements, as deemed appropriate by the board, for annual renewal of authorization; (e)  Enforcement of the requirements and conditions of authorization; and (f)  Inspection, monitoring, sampling and reporting on the performance of the system. Any system proposed for authorization in accordance with performance standards must be designed and certified by a licensed professional engineer in the State of Mississippi and must be authorized by the department before installation. (4)  To the extent practicable, all rules and regulations adopted under this chapter shall give maximum flexibility to persons installing individual on-site wastewater disposal systems and all options consistent with the federal Clean Water Act, consistent with maintaining the wastes on the property of the generator and consistent with protection of the public health.  In addition, all rules and regulations, to the extent practicable, shall encourage the use of economically feasible systems, including all techniques and technologies for individual on-site wastewater disposal. (5)  All regulations shall be applied uniformly in all areas of the state and shall take into consideration and make provision for different types of soil in the state when performing soil and site evaluations. SECTION 18. Sections 18 through 27 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the "Community Drinking Water Infrastructure Sustainability Act". SECTION 19. For purposes of Sections 18 through 27 of this act, the following words and phrases have the meanings as provided in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Community Public Water System" means a public water system serving at least fifteen (15) individual service connections used by year-round consumers or regularly servicing at least twenty-five (25) individual consumers year-round. (b)  "Board" means the Mississippi State Board of Health. (c)  "Person" means an individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, municipality or federal agency. SECTION 20. There is established a community public water system accountability process to: (a)  Support drinking water infrastructure sustainability for the citizens of Mississippi. (b)  Promote the protection of the citizens of Mississippi from poor water quality and deficient service by assuring the drinking water provided by Community Public Water Systems remains consistently at levels essential for health, safety, welfare, and long-term sustainability. (c)  Establish a transparent accountability process that creates clear standards and expectations for Community Public Water Systems so that assessment of their quality, performance, and sustainability will be understood. SECTION 21. The Mississippi Board of Health shall create and administer a statewide framework of accountability for community public water systems.  The framework shall include a letter grade schedule based on, at minimum, the following criteria: (a)  Federal water quality violation history. (b)  State violation history. (c)  Water system financial sustainability. (d)  Operation and maintenance performance history. (e)  Infrastructure condition and compliance. (f)  Customer satisfaction. (g)  Levels of secondary contaminants. SECTION 22. (1)  The board shall promulgate rules and regulations to establish and implement the community public water system letter grade schedule provided for in Sections 18 through 27 of this act.  The rules and regulations shall provide clear and appropriate point values for each standard set forth in this section and other assessed criteria as determined by the board that is used to calculate the community public water system's letter grade.  Point values shall be based on objective criteria so that each community public water system is assessed equally and fairly.  Community Public Water Systems shall be assigned a letter grade of "A", "B", "C", "D", or "F".  A consolidated score and letter grade shall be calculated on a weighted-average basis for any person owning more than one (1) community public water system in the state. (2)  For each community public water system, the board shall publish on its website an annual report summarizing the board's assessment, scores and letter grade.  Every community public water system shall provide notification to its customers of the board's published score and letter grade within thirty (30) days following publication by the board in a manner to be established by regulation by the board. SECTION 23. The board shall publish the first letter grades issued pursuant to Sections 18 through 27 of this act no later than January 1, 2028. SECTION 24.  Section 19-5-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-5-151.  (1)  Any contiguous area situated within any county of the state, and not being situated within the corporate boundaries of any existing municipality, and having no adequate water system, sewer system, garbage and waste collection and disposal system, or fire protection facilities serving such area, may become incorporated as a water district, as a sewer district, as a garbage and waste collection and disposal district, as a fire protection district, as a combined water and sewer district, as a combined water and garbage and waste collection and disposal district, as a combined water and fire protection district, or as a combined water, sewer, garbage and waste collection and disposal and fire protection district, in the manner set forth in the following sections. (2)  If the certificated area of a nonprofit, nonshare corporation chartered under the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act for the purpose of owning and operating rural waterworks lies in one (1) county, the corporation may become incorporated as a water district in the manner set forth in Section 19-5-153(3).  If the nonprofit, nonshare corporation's certificated area lies in more than one (1) county, the procedure in Section 19-5-164 shall be used. (3)  Whenever a majority of the landowners of any such district, excluding lands owned by the state, shall sign and file with the clerk of the chancery court by which such district was organized, or in the county in which such district was organized, a petition for the dissolution of such district, it shall be the duty of the clerk to give notice thereof by publishing the notice for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in the county, or in each of the counties in which lands of the district lie. Such notice shall be addressed to all persons interested in the district and shall command them to appear before the chancery court at a place named within the chancery court district on a day certain in term time, or before the chancellor in vacation, not earlier than twenty (20) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the date of the first publication of the notice, and show cause, if any they can, why the district should not be dissolved.  Upon the first publication of such notice, all proceedings of every kind of the district and of the commissioners of the district shall be discontinued until the hearing of such cause as herein provided. Such chancery court, or the chancellor thereof in vacation, shall take jurisdiction of such cause and shall hear the same on the return day thereof in the same manner as other causes in chancery. If upon the hearing of such cause it appears that it is to the best interests of the landowners of the district that such district be dissolved, such court or chancellor shall enter an order dissolving the district, decreeing that no further expenses or indebtedness be incurred or contracted by the commissioners of such district. The commissioners of such district shall immediately and within ten (10) days thereafter deposit with the clerk of the court in which the proceedings are pending all papers, records, and documents of the district. If it appears that it is not to the best interests of the landowners of the such district that it be dissolved, the chancellor or chancery court shall so decree. If it appears to the chancery court or chancellor that it is to the best interests of the district that it be dissolved and the decree is entered accordingly, the costs of the proceeding, including solicitors fees as might be allowed by the court, shall be assessed and taxed by the court to be collected on an acreage basis on the lands within the district; and thereafter the district shall be dissolved and shall have no further powers or authorities under the law whatsoever. If such district is not dissolved, such costs, attorneys fees, and expenses as may be involved shall be assessed against the petitioners; and the district shall be absolved from any liability on account thereof. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to impair or affect any contract or other obligation of any such district, but persons holding claims against such district shall, on notice of the dissolution thereof as provided herein, file any such claims as they may have against such district.  If the court should decree that such district should be liquidated, all of the claims shall be passed upon by the chancery court or chancellor, as the case may be, and if found just, a levy shall be made upon the lands upon an acreage basis as hereinabove provided, in order to liquidate and pay such indebtedness as may be found due and owing by the district. SECTION 25.  Section 19-5-165, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-165.  (1)  Beginning on the date of the adoption of the resolution creating any district, the district shall be a public corporation in perpetuity under its corporate name and shall, in that name, be a body politic and corporate with power of perpetual succession. (2)  If the creation of the district is initiated in accordance with Section 19-5-153(3), all assets and liabilities of the nonprofit, nonshare corporation shall become the assets and liabilities of the newly organized district without any further meetings, voting, notice to creditors or actions by members of the board beginning on the date of adoption of the resolution of the board of supervisors creating the district. SECTION 26.  Section 41-3-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-3-15.  (1)  (a)  There shall be a State Department of Health. (b)  The State Board of Health shall have the following powers and duties: (i)  To formulate the policy of the State Department of Health regarding public health matters within the jurisdiction of the department; (ii)  To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the department under any and all statutes within the department's jurisdiction, and as the board may deem necessary; (iii)  To apply for, receive, accept and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, trusts, devises, bequests, grants, endowments or funds from any other source or transfers of property of any kind; (iv)  To enter into, and to authorize the executive officer to execute contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the provisions of this chapter, if it finds those actions to be in the public interest and the contracts or agreements do not have a financial cost that exceeds the amounts appropriated for those purposes by the Legislature; (v)  To appoint, upon recommendation of the Executive Officer of the State Department of Health, a Director of Internal Audit who shall be either a Certified Public Accountant or Certified Internal Auditor, and whose employment shall be continued at the discretion of the board, and who shall report directly to the board, or its designee; and (vi)  To discharge such other duties, responsibilities and powers as are necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. (c)  The Executive Officer of the State Department of Health shall have the following powers and duties: (i)  To administer the policies of the State Board of Health within the authority granted by the board; (ii)  To supervise and direct all administrative and technical activities of the department, except that the department's internal auditor shall be subject to the sole supervision and direction of the board; (iii)  To organize the administrative units of the department in accordance with the plan adopted by the board and, with board approval, alter the organizational plan and reassign responsibilities as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the policies of the board; (iv)  To coordinate the activities of the various offices of the department; (v)  To employ, subject to regulations of the State Personnel Board, qualified professional personnel in the subject matter or fields of each office, and such other technical and clerical staff as may be required for the operation of the department.  The executive officer shall be the appointing authority for the department, and shall have the power to delegate the authority to appoint or dismiss employees to appropriate subordinates, subject to the rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board; (vi)  To recommend to the board such studies and investigations as he or she may deem appropriate, and to carry out the approved recommendations in conjunction with the various offices; (vii)  To prepare and deliver to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1 of each year, and at such other times as may be required by the Legislature or Governor, a full report of the work of the department and the offices thereof, including a detailed statement of expenditures of the department and any recommendations the board may have; (viii)  To prepare and deliver to the Chairmen of the Public Health and Welfare/Human Services Committees of the Senate and House on or before January 1 of each year, a plan for monitoring infant mortality in Mississippi and a full report of the work of the department on reducing Mississippi's infant mortality and morbidity rates and improving the status of maternal and infant health; and (ix)  To enter into contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the provisions of this chapter, if he or she finds those actions to be in the public interest and the contracts or agreements do not have a financial cost that exceeds the amounts appropriated for those purposes by the Legislature.  Each contract or agreement entered into by the executive officer shall be submitted to the board before its next meeting. (2)  The State Board of Health shall have the authority to establish an Office of Rural Health within the department.  The duties and responsibilities of this office shall include the following: (a)  To collect and evaluate data on rural health conditions and needs; (b)  To engage in policy analysis, policy development and economic impact studies with regard to rural health issues; (c)  To develop and implement plans and provide technical assistance to enable community health systems to respond to various changes in their circumstances; (d)  To plan and assist in professional recruitment and retention of medical professionals and assistants; and (e)  To establish information clearinghouses to improve access to and sharing of rural health care information. (3)  The State Board of Health shall have general supervision of the health interests of the people of the state and to exercise the rights, powers and duties of those acts which it is authorized by law to enforce. (4)  The State Board of Health shall have authority: (a)  To make investigations and inquiries with respect to the causes of disease and death, and to investigate the effect of environment, including conditions of employment and other conditions that may affect health, and to make such other investigations as it may deem necessary for the preservation and improvement of health. (b)  To make such sanitary investigations as it may, from time to time, deem necessary for the protection and improvement of health and to investigate nuisance questions that affect the security of life and health within the state. (c)  To direct and control sanitary and quarantine measures for dealing with all diseases within the state possible to suppress same and prevent their spread. (d)  To obtain, collect and preserve such information relative to mortality, morbidity, disease and health as may be useful in the discharge of its duties or may contribute to the prevention of disease or the promotion of health in this state. (e)  To charge and collect reasonable fees for health services, including immunizations, inspections and related activities, and the board shall charge fees for those services; however, if it is determined that a person receiving services is unable to pay the total fee, the board shall collect any amount that the person is able to pay.  Any increase in the fees charged by the board under this paragraph shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65. (f)  (i)  To establish standards for, issue permits and exercise control over, any cafes, restaurants, food or drink stands, sandwich manufacturing establishments, and all other establishments, other than churches, church-related and private schools, and other nonprofit or charitable organizations, where food or drink is regularly prepared, handled and served for pay; and (ii)  To require that a permit be obtained from the Department of Health before those persons begin operation.  If any such person fails to obtain the permit required in this subparagraph (ii), the State Board of Health, after due notice and opportunity for a hearing, may impose a monetary penalty not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation.  However, the department is not authorized to impose a monetary penalty against any person whose gross annual prepared food sales are less than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). Money collected by the board under this subparagraph (ii) shall be deposited to the credit of the State General Fund of the State Treasury. (g)  To promulgate rules and regulations and exercise control over the production and sale of milk pursuant to the provisions of Sections 75-31-41 through 75-31-49. (h)  On presentation of proper authority, to enter into and inspect any public place or building where the State Health Officer or his representative deems it necessary and proper to enter for the discovery and suppression of disease and for the enforcement of any health or sanitary laws and regulations in the state. (i)  To conduct investigations, inquiries and hearings, and to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and records at any hearing when authorized and required by statute to be conducted by the State Health Officer or the State Board of Health. (j)  To promulgate rules and regulations, and to collect data and information, on (i) the delivery of services through the practice of telemedicine; and (ii) the use of electronic records for the delivery of telemedicine services. (k)  To enforce and regulate domestic and imported fish as authorized under Section 69-7-601 et seq. (5)  (a)  The State Board of Health shall have the authority, in its discretion, to establish programs to promote the public health, to be administered by the State Department of Health. Specifically, those programs may include, but shall not be limited to, programs in the following areas: (i)  Maternal and child health; (ii)  Family planning; (iii)  Pediatric services; (iv)  Services to crippled and disabled children; (v)  Control of communicable and noncommunicable disease; (vi)  Chronic disease; (vii)  Accidental deaths and injuries; (viii)  Child care licensure; (ix)  Radiological health; (x)  Dental health; (xi)  Milk sanitation; (xii)  Occupational safety and health; (xiii)  Food, vector control and general sanitation; (xiv)  Protection of drinking water; (xv)  Sanitation in food handling establishments open to the public; (xvi)  Registration of births and deaths and other vital events; (xvii)  Such public health programs and services as may be assigned to the State Board of Health by the Legislature or by executive order; and (xviii)  Regulation of domestic and imported fish for human consumption. (b)  [Deleted] (c)  The State Department of Health may undertake such technical programs and activities as may be required for the support and operation of those programs, including maintaining physical, chemical, bacteriological and radiological laboratories, and may make such diagnostic tests for diseases and tests for the evaluation of health hazards as may be deemed necessary for the protection of the people of the state. (6)  (a)  The State Board of Health shall administer the local governments and rural water systems improvements loan program in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-16. (b)  The State Board of Health shall have authority: (i)  To enter into capitalization grant agreements with the United States Environmental Protection Agency, or any successor agency thereto; (ii)  To accept capitalization grant awards made under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended; (iii)  To provide annual reports and audits to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, as may be required by federal capitalization grant agreements; and (iv)  To establish and collect fees to defray the reasonable costs of administering the revolving fund or emergency fund if the State Board of Health determines that those costs will exceed the limitations established in the federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as amended.  The administration fees may be included in loan amounts to loan recipients for the purpose of facilitating payment to the board; however, those fees may not exceed five percent (5%) of the loan amount. (7)  [Deleted] (8)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized to issue a license to an existing home health agency for the transfer of a county from that agency to another existing home health agency, and to charge a fee for reviewing and making a determination on the application for such transfer not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the authorized fee assessed for the original application for the home health agency, with the revenue to be deposited by the State Department of Health into the special fund created under Section 41-7-188. (9)  [Deleted] (10)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized to extend and renew any certificate of need that has expired, and to charge a fee for reviewing and making a determination on the application for such action not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the authorized fee assessed for the original application for the certificate of need, with the revenue to be deposited by the State Department of Health into the special fund created under Section 41-7-188. (11)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized and empowered, to revoke, immediately, the license and require closure of any institution for the aged or infirm, including any other remedy less than closure to protect the health and safety of the residents of said institution or the health and safety of the general public. (12)  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the State Department of Health shall have the following specific powers:  The State Department of Health is authorized and empowered, to require the temporary detainment of individuals for disease control purposes based upon violation of any order of the State Health Officer, as provided in Section 41-23-5.  For the purpose of enforcing such orders of the State Health Officer, persons employed by the department as investigators shall have general arrest powers.  All law enforcement officers are authorized and directed to assist in the enforcement of such orders of the State Health Officer. (13)  Additionally, the State Board of Health and the State Health Officer each are authorized and directed to study the status of health care, in its broadest sense, throughout the state.  The study should include challenges such as access to care; the cost of care; indigent care; providing health care to the incarcerated; the availability of health care workers, paraprofessionals, and professionals; the effects of unhealthy lifestyle choices; the consequences of health care facilities locating in affluent and urban areas to the detriment of less affluent areas, small towns, and rural areas; and negative trends which may cause ill effects if they continue.  The study shall also include opportunities to improve health care, such as greater coordination among state agencies, local governments, and other entities which provide various types of health care; methods of increasing the health care workforce; and methods to increase the location of health care facilities in distressed areas, rural areas, and small towns.  All state agencies, the Legislative Budget Office and the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) are directed to assist the department in developing this study.  This provision does not by itself grant any additional power to the State Board of Health or the State Health Officer to require any entity to operate differently.  It does, however, empower and direct them to obtain information and make recommendations, and it does require all entities to cooperate with the board and health officer as they seek information. SECTION 27.  Section 41-26-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-26-3.  For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Administrator" means the Administrator of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency or the administrator's designee. (b)  "Board" means the Mississippi State Board of Health. (c)  "Community public water system" means a public water system serving at least fifteen (15) individual service connections used by year-round consumers or regularly servicing at least twenty-five (25) individual consumers year-round. (d)  "Construction" means any placement, assembly or installation of facilities or equipment, including contractual obligations to purchase those facilities or equipment, at the location where the equipment will be used, including any preparation work at any location. (e)  "Contaminant" means any physical, chemical, biological or radiological substance or matter in water. (f)  "Cross connection" means any direct interconnection between a public water system and a nonpublic water system or other source which may result in the contamination of the drinking water provided by the public water system. (g)  "Department" means the Mississippi State Department of Health. (h)  "Director" means the State Health Officer or the health officer's designee. (i)  "Federal act" means the Safe Drinking Water Act of 1974, as amended, principally codified as 42 USCS Section 300(f) et seq. (j)  "Federal agency" means any department, agency or instrumentality of the United States. (k)  "Interested party" means any person claiming an interest in the water system operation that is the subject of the hearing and who may be affected by the water system. (l)  "Maximum contaminant level" means the maximum permissible level of a contaminant in water which is delivered to any user of a public water system. (m)  "Municipality" means a city, town, village or other public body created by state law, or an Indian tribal organization authorized by law. (n)  "National primary drinking water regulations" means primary drinking water regulations promulgated by the administrator under the federal act. (o)  "Nontransient, noncommunity public water system" means a public water system that is not a community water system and that regularly serves at least twenty-five (25) of the same persons over six (6) months per year. (p)  "Person" means an individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, municipality or federal agency. (q)  "Public water system" means a system for providing to the public piped water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances if the system has at least fifteen (15) service connections or regularly serves at least twenty-five (25) individuals.  The term includes but is not limited to: (i)  Any collection, treatment, storage and distribution facilities under control of the operator of the system and used primarily in connection with the system; and (ii)  Any collection or pre-treatment storage facilities not under the control which are used primarily in connection with the system. (r)  "Semi-public water system" means a system for the provision to the public of water for human consumption through pipes or other constructed conveyances if the system has more than one (1) but less than fifteen (15) service connections. (s)  "Supplier of water" means any person who owns, or controls a public water system. (t)  "Violator" means a public water system, an officer or director of a public water system, an operator, certified or otherwise, or any other person designated by a public water system or the department as the official responsible for the operation of a public water system. SECTION 28.  For purposes of Sections 1 through 28 of this act, notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Chapter 3 to Title 77 of the Mississippi Code, during any period a Community Public Water System or Community Public Wastewater System is assigned a letter grade of "D" or "F", any such system shall be considered grossly inefficient, irresponsible and unresponsive to the needs of its customers such that it will be deemed to be failing to render reasonably adequate service and from that point forward shall be subject to the authority and jurisdiction of the Mississippi Public Service Commission for the sole purpose of exercising any rights afforded said commission under Sections 77-3-21 and 77-3-22. SECTION 29.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.